Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-535
District; public meeting; board of directors.

After the filing of a written order by the county board pursuant to section 35-533, the county clerk shall then fix a time and place for a public meeting of all registered voters who are residing within the boundaries. A board of directors shall be elected as provided in section 35-506 and shall have the powers as provided in section 35-508.

Laws 1978, LB 907, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 1120, § 24.